District of Columbia statutes.
29A-612

Repealed

Service of process against corporation.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1282, ch. 854, § 585
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(5), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-612.
1981 Ed., § 29-812.
1973 Ed., § 29-412.